Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1968.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 8309.1. Personal rights.(a) Prohibition.--A person, whether or not acting under color of law, may not interfere by threat, intimidation or coercion, or attempt to interfere by threat, intimidation or coercion, with the exercise or enjoyment by an individual of a right secured by the Constitution of the United States, the Constitution of Pennsylvania, the laws of the United States or the laws of this Commonwealth.(b) Civil action by district attorney or Attorney General.--1234567891011121314151617 (1) In the event of an alleged violation of subsection (a), the district attorney of the county in which the violation allegedly occurred or the Attorney General, after consulting with the district attorney, may bring a civil action to protect the exercise or enjoyment of the right described under subsection (a).(2) A civil action under this subsection may seek either or both of the following:(i) Injunctive or other appropriate equitable relief.(ii) A civil penalty not exceeding $25,000. If awarded, the civil penalty shall be:(A) Assessed individually against each person determined to have violated subsection (a).(B) Awarded to each individual who was not able to exercise or enjoy the right described under subsection (a).(c) Civil action by individual.--(1) In the event of an alleged violation of subsection (a), an individual who allegedly was not able to exercise or enjoy the right described under subsection (a) may bring a civil action in the name and on behalf of the individual to protect the exercise or enjoyment of the right.(2) A civil action under this subsection may seek any one or combination of the following:(i) Damages.(ii) Injunctive or other appropriate equitable relief.(iii) Declaratory relief.(iv) Reasonable attorney fees.20250HB1968PN2483 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Venue.--(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a civil action brought under subsection (b) or (c) shall be filed in the court of common pleas of the county in which:(i) the violation allegedly occurred; or(ii) the person alleged to have committed the violation resides, is employed on a regular basis or has a place of business.(2) A civil action brought by the Attorney General in accordance with subsection (b) may be filed in the court of common pleas of any county in this Commonwealth, in which case the jurisdiction of the court shall extend throughout this Commonwealth.(e) Injunctive relief.--(1) If, in a civil action brought in accordance with subsection (b) or (c), a court issues an order granting injunctive relief in which a defendant is ordered to refrain from certain conduct or activities, the order must contain the following statement: "VIOLATION OF THIS ORDER IS A CRIMINAL OFFENSE."(2) A willful and knowing violation of an order described in paragraph (1) shall be:(i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii), a misdemeanor of the third degree.(ii) A misdemeanor of the second degree if bodily injury results from the violation.(f) Likely acts of violence.--If the court determines that an act of violence is likely to occur either against the individual who prevailed in the civil action under this section or otherwise, the court shall direct the individual or the clerk 20250HB1968PN2483 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the court to provide a copy of the order as soon as practicable to each law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the residence of the individual or over any other location where the act of violence is likely to occur, as designated by the individual. Each designated law enforcement agency shall provide, to any law enforcement officer responding to the scene of a reported act of violence, information as to the existence, terms and current status of the order.(g) Attorney fees.--In addition to any damages, injunctive or other appropriate equitable relief or declaratory relief awarded in a civil action brought in accordance with subsection (c), the court may, upon request or sua sponte, award the plaintiff reasonable attorney fees.(h) Nonexclusivity.--The filing of a civil action under this section, and any civil penalty, damages, injunctive or other appropriate equitable relief, declaratory relief or attorney fees ordered as a result of the civil action, shall not preclude filing any other action or seeking any other remedy available under Federal or State law.(i) Speech.--Speech alone is not sufficient to support an action brought in accordance with subsection (b) or (c), except upon a showing that all of the following apply:(1) The speech itself threatens violence against a specific individual or group of individuals.(2) The individual or group of individuals against whom the threat is directed reasonably fears that, because of the speech, violence will be committed against the individual or group of individuals or the property of the individual or group of individuals.(3) The person threatening violence had the apparent 20250HB1968PN2483 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ability to carry out the threat.(j) Limitations on orders.--The following apply to an order issued in a civil action under this section:(1) The order may not restrict the content of any person's speech.(2) If an order restricts the time, place or manner of any person's speech, the order may do so only to the extent reasonably necessary to protect the peaceable exercise or enjoyment of constitutional or statutory rights, consistent with the constitutional or statutory rights of the defendant.(k) Waiver prohibited.--The provisions of this section, including rights, penalties, remedies, forums and procedures, may not be waived by contract.(l) Sovereign immunity.--The sovereign immunity provisions of Chapter 85 (relating to matters affecting government units) shall not apply to a cause of action brought in accordance with this section against a peace officer or a governmental entity that employs a peace officer.(m) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Peace officer." As defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 501 (relating to definitions).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1968PN2483 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324